Vermont, session 2025-2026, H867.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 481 is amended to read:
§ 481. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter, the following terms are defined as follows:
* * *
(6) A “sign” is any structure, display, device, or representation, either
temporary or permanent, portable, mobile, vehicle-mounted, or ground-
mounted, that is designed or used to advertise or call attention to any thing,
person, business, activity, or place and is visible from any highway or other
right-of-way. It does not include the flag, pennant, or insignia of any nation,
VT LEG #385164 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.867
2026 Page 2 of 3
state, or town. Whenever dimensions of a sign are specified, they shall include
panels and frames.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 494 is amended to read:
§ 494. EXEMPT SIGNS
The following signs are exempt from the requirements of this chapter
except as indicated in section 495 of this title:
* * *
(2) Signs on registered and inspected motor vehicles, except those that
are determined by the Travel Information Council to be circumventing the
intent purpose of this chapter. Circumvention includes signs that are
continuously in the same location or signs that extend beyond the height,
width, or length of the vehicle.
* * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 503 is amended to read:
§ 503. PENALTY
(a) A person who violates this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty of
not more than $50.00 subject to a civil penalty of:
(1) $150.00 for a first offense;
(2) $250.00 for a second offense; and
(3) $500.00 for a third or subsequent offense.
VT LEG #385164 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.867
2026 Page 3 of 3
(b) Each day the violation of this chapter continues shall be a separate
offense.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385164 v.1